Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB652.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.4433 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "school mapping data" means mapping information provided in an electronic or a
digital format to assist first responders in responding to emergencies at schools.
(2) (a) The General Assembly does hereby establish the School Mapping Data Program to be administered by
the Kentucky 911 Services Board[Center for School Safety]. The Kentucky 911 Services Board[Center
for School Safety] shall utilize available funds to develop school mapping data for each public school,
public charter school, and any private school that requests to participate in the program. The program
shall be administered by the Kentucky 911 Services Board[Center for School Safety] pursuant to this
section, which may include contracting for services pursuant to the relevant provisions of the Kentucky
Model Procurement Code in KRS Chapter 45A. The Kentucky 911 Services Board[Center for School
Safety] shall be responsible for ensuring that all funds received for and expended related to the School
Mapping Data Program are utilized for the purposes of school mapping.
(b) The Kentucky 911 Services Board[Center for School Safety] shall provide the data developed by the
program to the state school security marshal, participating schools, participating districts, and local law
enforcement and public safety agencies for use in response to emergencies and for conducting drills
required under KRS 158.162(5). The school mapping data shall be excluded from the application of
KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(c) The Kentucky 911 Services Board[Center for School Safety] shall apply for any federal grant funds that
may be used to accomplish the purposes of the program. The Kentucky 911 Services Board[Center for
School Safety] may also solicit private funds to support the program.
(3) The School Mapping Data Program shall establish a single verified source of mapping data for each
participating school campus in the state that is standardized, accurate, and accessible to public safety agencies
to ensure efficient response to any emergency on a school campus. The school mapping data provided shall:
(a) Be compatible with software platforms used by local, county, state, and federal public safety agencies
that provide emergency services to the specific school for which the data is provided without requiring
such agencies to purchase additional software or requiring a fee to view or access the data;
(b) Be compatible with security software platforms in use by the participating school or district for which
the data is provided without requiring the school or district to purchase additional software or requiring
a fee to view or access the data;
(c) Be in a printable format and, if requested by a law enforcement or public safety agency or participating
school or district in addition to those described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, be in a digital file
format that can be integrated into interactive mobile platforms in use;
(d) Be verified by the Kentucky 911 Services Board, or any entity contracted by the Kentucky 911
Services Board to develop the mapping data pursuant to this section[Center for School Safety] for
accuracy by a walk-through of school buildings and grounds;
(e) Be oriented to true north;
(f) Include accurate floor plans overlaid on current, verified aerial imagery of campus;
(g) Contain site-specific labeling that matches the structure of school buildings that includes:
1. Room labels;
2. Hallway names or identifiers;
3. External door or stairwell numbers;
4. Locations of hazards;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
5. Critical utility locations;
6. Key boxes;
7. Automated external defibrillators; and
8. Trauma kits;
(h) Contain site-specific labeling that matches the school grounds that includes:
1. Parking areas;
2. Athletic fields;
3. Surrounding roads; and
4. Neighboring properties;
(i) Be overlaid with a gridded coordinate system;
(j) Not be modified or updated independently without corresponding updates to school mapping data
within software platforms used by local, county, state, and federal public safety agencies that provide
emergency services to the specific school; and
(k) Provide to public safety agencies and participating schools or districts the school mapping data
developed pursuant to the program perpetually and at no cost to the public safety agencies or
participating schools or districts.
(4) A participating school district or campus shall not be required to adopt new school mapping data if, as of July
1, 2024, the school district or campus previously implemented school mapping data with capabilities that meet
the requirements of subsection (3)(a) to (k) of this section.
Section 2. KRS 65.7629 is amended to read as follows:
The board shall administer the provisions of KRS 65.7621 to 65.7643, and shall have the following powers and
duties:
(1) To review, evaluate, and approve or disapprove the plans or plan modifications that are submitted to the board
for complying with the wireless E911 service requirements established by the FCC order and by any rules or
regulations which are or may be adopted by the Federal Communications Commission in carrying out the FCC
order;
(2) To develop standards to be followed by the board in reviewing, evaluating, approving, or disapproving the
plans or plan modifications that are submitted to the board;
(3) (a) To collect the CMRS service charge from each CMRS connection:
1. With a place of primary use, as defined in 4 U.S.C. sec. 124, within the Commonwealth; or
2. For prepaid CMRS connections, until January 1, 2017, at which time the CMRS prepaid service
charge imposed under KRS 65.7634 and collected under KRS 142.100 to 142.135 shall take
effect and this subparagraph shall no longer be in force:
a. With a place of primary use, as defined in 4 U.S.C. sec. 124, within the Commonwealth;
or
b. With a geographical location associated with the first six (6) digits, or NPA/NXX, of the
mobile telephone number is inside the geographic boundaries of the Commonwealth.
(b) The CMRS postpaid service charge, and until January 1, 2017, the CMRS prepaid service charge, shall
be seventy cents ($0.70) per month per CMRS connection, to be calculated, collected, and remitted in
accordance with KRS 65.7635. The amount of the CMRS service charge shall not be increased except
by act of the General Assembly;
(4) To deposit the proceeds of the CMRS prepaid service charge levied under KRS 65.7634 that are collected by
the Department of Revenue into the CMRS fund established by KRS 65.7627 and to distribute those revenues
in accordance with KRS 65.7631. The CMRS prepaid service charge shall be calculated, collected, and
remitted in accordance with KRS 65.7634 and 142.100 to 142.135;
(5) To administer and maintain the CMRS fund according to the provisions of KRS 65.7627, and promptly to
deposit all revenues from the CMRS service charges into the CMRS fund;

CHAPTER 163 3
(6) To make disbursements from the CMRS fund, according to the allocations and requirements established in
KRS 65.7631;
(7) To establish procedures and guidelines to be followed by the board in reviewing, evaluating, and approving or
disapproving disbursements from the CMRS fund and requests for disbursements made in accordance with
KRS 65.7631;
(8) To resolve conflicts regarding reimbursable costs and expenses under KRS 65.7631(4);
(9) To submit annual reports to the Auditor of Public Accounts no later than sixty (60) days after the close of each
fiscal year, which shall provide an accounting for all CMRS service charges deposited into the CMRS fund
during the preceding fiscal year and all disbursements to CMRS providers and PSAPs during the preceding
fiscal year;
(10) To employ consultants, engineers, and other persons and employees as may be, in the judgment of the board,
essential to the board's operations, functions, and responsibilities, and to fix and pay their compensation from
funds available to the board;
(11) To acquire, by gift, purchase, installment purchase, or lease, any equipment necessary to carry out the board's
purposes and duties;
(12) To retain any and all information, including all proprietary information, that is submitted to the board by
CMRS providers and PSAPs, for the purposes of maintaining it and verifying its accuracy;
(13) To retain, with approval by the Auditor of Public Accounts, an independent certified public accountant who
shall audit, once every twenty-four (24) months, the books of the board, CMRS providers, and PSAPs eligible
to request or receive disbursements from the CMRS fund under KRS 65.7631 for the following purposes:
(a) To verify the accuracy of collection, receipts, and disbursements of all revenues derived from the
CMRS service charges and the number of wireless E911 calls received by each PSAP eligible to request
or receive disbursements from the CMRS fund;
(b) To determine whether the revenues generated by the CMRS service charges equal, exceed, or are less
than the costs incurred in order to comply with the FCC order;
(c) To determine the sufficiency of the funds currently being withheld for administrative purposes under
KRS 65.7631(2); and
(d) To verify the accuracy of CMRS customer count information reported to the board by CMRS providers.
The independent certified public accountant shall make a report of the audits to the board and to the
appropriate chief executive officer or officers of the CMRS providers and PSAPs, and to the local
governments responsible for the formation of the PSAP. The independent certified public accountant shall also
forward a copy of the audits conducted pursuant to this subsection to the Legislative Research Commission for
referral to the appropriate committee or committees and to the Auditor of Public Accounts. Upon request, the
independent certified accountant shall send any work papers related to the audits to the Auditor of Public
Accounts. All information with respect to the audits shall be released to the public or published only in
aggregate amounts which do not identify or allow identification of numbers of subscribers or revenues
attributable to individual CMRS providers;
(14) To ensure that all carriers have an equal opportunity to participate in the wireless E911 system;
(15) To ensure that wireless E911 systems are compatible with wireline E911 systems;
(16) To determine the appropriate method for disbursing funds to PSAP's based on wireless workload under KRS
65.7631(5)(b);
(17) To develop standards and protocols for the improvement and increased efficiency of 911 services in Kentucky;
(18) To provide direct grants or state matches for federal, state, or private grants for the establishment or
improvement of the 911 emergency telecommunications system in the Commonwealth;[ and]
(19) To develop and implement standards for advancements and new technology in the operation of emergency
telecommunications in the state, including the development and implementation of next generation 911
service; and
(20) To administer and oversee the School Mapping Data Program established in Section 1 of this Act.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Section 3. KRS 158.442 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly hereby authorizes the establishment of the Center for School Safety. The center's
mission shall be to serve as the central point for data analysis; research; dissemination of information about
successful school safety and school security programs, best practices, training standards, research results, and
new programs; and, in collaboration with the Department of Education and others, to provide technical
assistance for safe schools.
(2) To fulfill its mission, the Center for School Safety shall:
(a) Establish a clearinghouse for information and materials concerning school violence prevention;
(b) Provide program development and implementation expertise and technical support to schools, law
enforcement agencies, and communities, which may include coordinating training for administrators,
teachers, students, parents, and other community representatives;
(c) Analyze the data collected in compliance with KRS 158.444;
(d) Research and evaluate school safety programs so schools and communities are better able to address
their specific needs;
(e) Administer a school safety grant program for local districts as directed by the General Assembly;
(f) Promote the formation of interagency efforts to address discipline and safety issues within communities
throughout the state in collaboration with other postsecondary education institutions and with local
juvenile delinquency prevention councils;
(g) Prepare and disseminate information regarding best practices in creating safe and effective schools;
(h) Advise the Kentucky Board of Education on administrative policies and administrative regulations
relating to school safety and security;
(i) By July 1 of each year, provide an annual report to the Governor, the Kentucky Board of Education, and
the Interim Joint Committee on Education regarding the status of school safety in Kentucky, including
the number and placement of school resource officers working in school districts in Kentucky and the
source of funding and method of employment for each position in accordance with KRS 158.4414;
(j) Develop and implement a school safety coordinator training program based on national and state best
practices in collaboration with the Kentucky Department of Education for school safety coordinators
appointed pursuant to KRS 158.4412. The training shall be approved by the board of directors of the
Center for School Safety and include instruction on at least the following:
1. Policies and procedures for conducting emergency response drills using an all-hazards approach
including hostage and active shooter situations;
2. Identification and response to threats to school safety and security; and
3. Preparing for, conducting, and reviewing school security risk assessments in accordance with
KRS 158.4410;
(k) Develop and implement a system to provide certification to school districts that the center has verified
that:
1. A potential Kentucky guardian, as defined in KRS 158.4431, has met all of the requirements of
KRS 158.4431(3); and
2. Individuals employed as guardians meet the requirements of KRS 158.4431(4) and (5), as
necessary;
(l) If funds are available, employ an individual whose job responsibilities include oversight of the guardian
program, including but not limited to:
1. The requirements of paragraph (k) of this subsection; and
2. The creation of model policy to be used by local boards of education when adopting the policies
in KRS 158.4431(8); and
(m) [Administer and oversee the School Mapping Data Program established pursuant to KRS 158.4433; and

CHAPTER 163 5
(n) ]Award a school safety coordinator certificate of completion to a school safety coordinator upon
satisfactory completion of the training program.
(3) The Center for School Safety shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of fifteen (15) members.
Members shall consist of:
(a) The commissioner or a designee of the Department of Education;
(b) The secretary or a designee of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(c) The commissioner or a designee of the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and
Intellectual Disabilities;
(d) The commissioner or a designee of the Department of Kentucky State Police;
(e) The commissioner or a designee of the Department of Criminal Justice Training;
(f) The executive director or a designee of the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security;
(g) A representative which shall be appointed by the Governor from one (1) list of three (3) names
submitted by the Kentucky League of Cities;
(h) A representative which shall be appointed by the Governor from one (1) list of three (3) names
submitted by the Kentucky School Boards Association;
(i) A representative which shall be appointed by the Governor from one (1) list of three (3) names
submitted by the Kentucky Association of School Superintendents;
(j) A representative which shall be appointed by the Governor from one (1) list of three (3) names
submitted by the Kentucky Association of School Resource Officers;
(k) A representative which shall be appointed by the Governor from one (1) list of three (3) names
submitted by the Kentucky Education Association;
(l) A representative which shall be appointed by the Governor from one (1) list of three (3) names
submitted by the Kentucky School Nurses Association;
(m) A representative which shall be appointed by the Governor from one (1) list of three (3) names
submitted by the Kentucky Association for Psychology in the Schools;
(n) A representative which shall be appointed by the Governor from one (1) list of three (3) names
submitted by the Kentucky School Counselor Association; and
(o) A representative which shall be appointed by the Governor from one (1) list of three (3) names
submitted by the Kentucky Parent Teacher Association.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 12.028, the Center for School Safety and its board of directors shall not be subject to
reorganization by the Governor.
Section 4. Whereas accurate school mapping data is a critical tool for first responders in protecting the
safety of students in our public schools during an emergency response, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act
takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Veto Overridden April 14, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version